Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2137
Accounts of district; audit and approval; expenditures; records; public inspection.

All accounts of the metropolitan utilities district shall be audited by the secretary and approved by a committee of the board to be styled the committee on accounts and expenditures. No money shall be appropriated out of any fund except on the recorded affirmative vote of a majority of all the members of the board. The records of the metropolitan utilities district shall be at all times subject to inspection and examination by the public during business hours.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 7, p. 353;

R.S.1913, § 4249;

C.S.1922, § 3752;

C.S.1929, § 14-1008;

R.S.1943, § 14-1013;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1013;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 37.